Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1459.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 6SPECIAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO ORDINANCESSec.601. (Reserved).602. Multiple-unit dwelling zoning ordinances.§ 601. (Reserved).§ 602. Multiple-unit dwelling zoning ordinances.(a) Multiple-unit dwellings.--A zoning ordinance of a municipality shall allow as a permitted use by right multiple-unit dwellings and mixed-use developments that include multiple-unit dwellings on a parcel or lot that:123456789101112131415161718 (1) has a will-serve letter from both a municipal water system and a municipal sewer system; and(2) is located in a commercial zone.(b) Parking space requirements.--Zoning regulations in a municipality may not include a requirement to provide more than:(1) one off-street residential parking space for each unit and accessible parking spaces as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327); or(2) an equivalent number of parking spaces required under paragraph (1) provided through a shared parking agreement.(c) Planning agency review.--(1) A municipality may petition the appropriate county or regional planning agency to review a proposed development permitted under subsection (a) and the impact a proposed development will have on existing infrastructure.(2) If a petition is filed, the agency shall review the petition and make a determination regarding the existing infrastructure's capacity for the proposed development. The agency may require the developer to make reasonable improvements to the existing infrastructure as a condition of allowing the development. The required improvements may only be those that are necessary for upgrading the existing infrastructure's capacity for the proposed development.(d) Applicability.--This section shall apply to a municipality:(1) with a population over 5,000 as of the most recent Federal decennial census; and(2) situated within a county that was reported to have 20250HB1459PN1712 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an increase in total population in the most recent Federal decennial census from the immediate prior Federal decennial census.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt definitions or uses as defined in the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial zone." A parcel or lot zoned for office, commercial or mixed use. The term does not include a parcel or lot zoned for industrial, agricultural or natural conservation use."Dwelling unit." A single unit providing complete independent living facilities for one or more individuals, including permanent facilities for cooking, eating, living, sanitation and sleeping."Mixed-use development." A development consisting of residential use in combination with assembly, business, education or mercantile use as defined by the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act."Multiple-unit dwelling." A building designed for three or more dwelling units in which the dwelling units share a common separation like a ceiling or wall and in which access cannot be gained between units through an internal doorway, excluding common hallways."Municipality." A city, including a city with a home rule charter, township, borough or incorporated town.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1459PN1712 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930